CHAPTER I.
THE SEA-VIEW.
The
scenes of the following story are laid about the beautiful shores and
among the pleasant islands of Boston Bay, near the close of the last war with
Great Britain. This contest, it will be remembered, was remarkably
characterised
for the great number, boldness and success of the privateers which
sailed out of the New England ports and covered every sea whitened by
British
commerce.
It was a warm, summery afternoon in the month of September and towards
its close, in the year 1814, that a group composed of four individuals were
standing in a cupola upon the top of one of the tasteful country seats that now,
as well as at that period, graced the green borders of the Bay of Islands. They
were looking earnestly towards the sea, which was in full view from their
position
,
its blue waves indeed coming within a hundred rods of the grounds
where they unfolded their shining volumes upon a belt of white sand that for
a league stretched in a graceful curve to the southward.
Two of the party had spy-glasses which they looked through long and
closely while the others hung breathless upon the report they, from time to time,
gave, while with unaided vision they sought to make out the movements of
three vessels in the offing and full six miles distant, which were the objects at
which the glasses were so steadily levelled. The lawn in front of the villa also
contained a group of spectators, principally servants, male and female,
gardners
and farmers, who were no less interested in watching the movements
seaward
,
and were by no means backward in their expressions of doubts, hope,
fears and other emotions, which the sight of these vessels seemed to produce
in one and all of them. On a small elevation half a mile north of the dwelling
was also gathered a cluster of country-people, and where the trees that
surrounded
the other country seats along this pleasant winding portion of the bay
would permit a sight of them to be obtained, it could be seen that their roofs
and piazzas and the eminences in their grounds contained lookers-out upon
the sea.
Suddenly a wreath of pale blue smoke shot horizontally from the larger of
the three vessels, whose movements seemed to be the centre of such general
regard. A quarter of a minute elapsed during which a deep silence fell upon
the expectant, listening, breathless groups taking place of the loud murmurs
and exclamations of surprise which the sight of the smoke had called forth
from every lip. Then came dull but distinct to every ear the explosion of a
cannon!
Some two or three of those in front of the villa on hearing this ominous
sound, retreated with pale faces towards the house, and one fellow in a blue
frock and a cart-whip in his hand took up a safe position behind the trunk of
the large oak under which they were all standing. Some of the bolder fellows
laughed at this fear, and the gardner, a thin faced Scotchman with red hair,
leaning on his spade said deliberately, and with a sneer of contempt,
`Hoot, an' awa' mon! an is it ye'll fear the shot o' the ships guns 'll be
comin sax miles to ken if yer head ha' ony brains i' the side o' it?
`But they
mout
hit a faller, Mackey,' answered the clown blushing, but still
keeping his place; `there's no tellin' how far them cannon ball can go nor
what they may do! It's always best to look out when them are kind o' parch'
corn be hoppin' about.'
`You are a fool, John,' answered a man who had a tarpaulin on his head but
otherwise was dressed like the farmer's men of the party. `A cannon ball such
as that are frigate or corvette or what not she is, fires, could'nt go more nor
three mile with the best powder they could load her guns with. I ought to'
know somethin' bout sich matters, coz we was, you know, chased into Boston
harbor by one o' the Britisher's brigs, when I was in skipper Bill's fishin
smack! That
was
a chase, and we sailed jest like a gul; and skipper and I
and the two boys was all the time at work keepin' the sails wet, and we got
inside o' the light and snapped our fingers at 'em, darn 'em!' Here the man
of such vast experience snapped his fingers and looked round for applause, and
then gave a short laugh with a glance around, to show his contempt of all the
green bunkers present.
The firing of the gun had produced a startling sensation also in the group
upon the roof. It was composed of an elderly gentleman of a very dignified
appearance, who wore an undress military frock, with the sleeve for the left
arm pinned up to his shoulders, for he had lost the arm not many months
before
in the battle of Plattsburg. He was about forty-eight years of age and
had one of those faces like Washington's, which express, in so remarkable a
degree, firmness, dignity and courage. He was holding out the glass with one
arm, while a beautiful girl of eighteen, who resembled him, was assisting him
in supporting it. The person with the other spy-glass in his hand was a young
man of fine appearance, about four or five and twenty, and from his strong
likeness to the young lady, was her brother. His dress was that of a citizen,
and from his appearance he was a student, perhaps either of medicine or law,
or perhaps of divinity. His face was strongly marked with intelligence and
an expression of grave mildness characterised it. He looked like a person of
books and retirement; and one little likely to mingle in the scenes of the war;
though his countenance indicated firmness and courage if called into action.
The fourth person was also a young man, and a year or two older than the one
we have described. His appearance was also very different and dissimilar.
He wore the naval button upon his coat though now he had no claim to this
distinction, having been three months before dismissed from the navy for
having
left his ship to visit this place where we now find him, and to see the very
maiden in whose presence he now was. She was his cousin, and he had long
been deeply enamored with her, and consent had been given by the father
though
not
by the brotherto their betrothal a year before; but as the young
officer had acquired free habits in the naval stations abroad and lost much of
that purity of character upon which had been based both her consent and that
of Colonel Hood her father, her brother, Henry Hood, had written him that
the consent of his betrothal to his sister `had been withdrawn!' This
announcement
,
which he received when his ship lay at Newport, had the effect
of awakening all his resentment against the writer of the note, whom he
conceived
the instigator of this change of determination, and believing that she
had been overruled in her feelings by him, he resolved to see her and
ascertain
the truth from her own lips. Notwithstanding his ship was about to sail
to meet a frigate of the enemy that had been hovering off the mouth of the bay, he
was too much under the influence of his feelings to delay, and being refused leave
of absence, he secretly left the ship under cover of night and swam to the
little
island off the town, near which the American frigate lay, and thence in a
small fishing skiff reached the main land. He immediately proceeded across
the conntry to `Seaview Manor,' the seat of Colonel Hood, and presented
himself
suddenly before the family. As Colonel Hood was his guardian as well
as his uncle and that was, therefore, his home when on shore, his presence was
not surprising to them; though when Colonel Hood learned that the letter he
had received from Henry had brought him there, and that he had left the ship
for the purpose, just as she was about to sail on a cruise, his displeasure was
very strongly expressed. Hebert Vincent found his fair cousin received him
with very marked coldness, but that Henry's manner was precisely as ever,
quiet and friendly, as if no note had been written. The young officer did not
tell them that he had deserted his ship; and as he expressed much contrition
to his uncle and made firm resolutions of amending his life, he was received
and entertained with kindness. He had not been at home many days,
however
,
ere he was satisfied that Mary Hood still loved him; and he received a
promise from her own lips that if he would renew that integrity and worth of
character which he had tarnished by his vices she might yet one day reward
him with her hand.
Hardly, however, had this confession and sweet hope been held out to the
gay young man, than Colonel Hood entered holding the Boston Centinel in his
hand, and with an indignant countenance handed it to Hebert.
`See that, sir! Is this the way you disgrace your country, your family,
yourself!'
The young officer glanced at the paragraph indicated and read as follows:
`Hebert Vincent, late midshipman in the Navy of the United States, having
deserted his ship at Newport, is dismissed from the service; his expulsion to
take effect from the 14th inst.
Navy Department
,
`Washington,
Sept. 28, 1814.'
The disgraced young man's cheek became deadly pale as he read it, while
his uncle watched his face closely. He had not anticipated this, and the full
force of his imprudence rushed upon him; for although he was inclined to
dissipation
,
he was by no means insensible to the honorable sentiments becoming
his rank as a gentleman and an officer; nay, it was his quick sensitiveness on
these points that had led him so impulsively to hasten to do away the prejudice
against him and seek restoration to the favor of her he loved. He now saw
the consequences of his precipitation, and the sense of his fallen position stung
him to the quick. He saw, however, with a self-possession and readiness of
action characteristic, that it was now too late to retrieve the past. He
therefore
resolved to meet it coolly.
`You see, Mary, what I have incurred by my desire to know the truth
whether you had really cast me off as well as my uncle and cousin!' he said,
handing her the paper.
She read it with a colorless cheek and with a shriek that told how deeply
her heart had been interested in one who had proved unworthy, she fell
insensible
into her father's arms. Finding that there was at present no
opportunity
for recounciliation with his uncle the young officer abruptly left the
house, but bearing with him the secret assurance in his heart that his cousin
devotedly loved him; and that yet fortune might favor him in spite of the
opposition
of her father and brother. In a few days he wrote a letter to his uncle
from Boston, in which he regretted his conduct and renounced all claim to the
hand of his cousin, and trusted that he should be permitted to visit the family
on the terms of a friend. He at the same time desired that his property, which
was considerable, and which for three or four years he had entrusted to his
uncle's care might be conveyed into his own possession, as he should now
devote
himself to its increase in some profitable avocation.
This letter was successful. Hebert after an absence of a month was
suffered
to return, and he had from that time, though keeping his rooms in town,
been a frequent guest at Seaview; though he never met his lovely cousin
except
in the presence of her father or brother; but her pale cheek, her
embarrassed
silence, told him too well the deep hold he still held upon her affections.
He had, moreover, he believed ingratiated himself into her esteem as well as
holding her affections by a letter he had privately addressed to her which she
had never returned to him; in which he defended his desertion from his ship
on the ground of his deep and ardent love for her, which was paramount to
every other consideration. He used arguments of the most ingenious
sophistry
to exculpate his conduct and at the same time delicately to gratify that
gentle vanity which is found in a greater or less degree in every woman's
heart.
The truth was then, that although his uncle ceased to respect him and rather
endured than was pleased with his society; that although Henry carried
himself
towards him only with that courteous and mild bearing which an amiable
man extends towards one he can neither love nor respect, yet the maiden in
her heart loved him with a strength she had vainly tried to overcome, for her
pride of character led her strongly to condemn his character and conduct, and
while intellect disapproved, her weak heart forgave.
Such was the respective positions in relation to each other of the group
which we have introduced to the reader in the cupola of the villa. We will
now return to the scenes more immediately before us.
CHAPTER II.
THE MERCHANT-MAN.
We
have said the report of the guns from the larger vessel produced no
little emotion in the group we have been describing as gathered in the cupola.
`There can be no doubt of the fate of the merchant-man now', said Colonel
Hood, as the report reached their ears.
`God grant that she may yet escape,' said Henry Hood, with an animated
expression upon his finely intellectual face.
`She deserves it, for she has manuvred well!' said Hebert Vincent. `If
she could have got into the passage between the islands before the frigate took
the wind of her and cut her off, she would have run up to town in spite of her.'
`There is another gun,' exclaimed Colonel Hood, with heightened glow
and speaking with the energy of a military man who could enter fully, heart
and soul, into a contest like the present.
`Yes, and there goes the forty-two of the privateer!' exclaimed Vincent.
`I knew that saucy little fellow wasn't hovering round the merchant-man
without
intending to have a finger in the pie.'
`That gun sounds like a peal of thunder,' said Mary, who could not but
catch the spirit of the moment. `Oh that the poor vessel may yet escape!'
`There goes anotheranotherand there roars the whole broadside!' cried
Vincent.
`They are discharged at the privateer-schooner,' said Colonel Hood with the
glass still at his eye.
`And there, hear that?' said Hebert. `It is the forty-four's bay again, and
at the distance she lays from the Englishman, she can play at bowls with him
and pitch her shot among his men and spars and hit just where she pleases.'
`And do you think the corvette's balls fall short?' asked Henry of Vincent,
as likely to understand the subject best.
`The largest gun the corvette has is a thirty-two, and they will fall short at
the distance at which you see the privateer has taken up her position; while
the forty-four from the little schooner will reach full a mile further than any of
the corvette's!'
`I did not think of this advantage before,' responded Henry Hood, `take the
glass and see what you think they are doing, Hebert. There goes the
forty-four
again.'
`Steady, my child, steady!' said Colonel Hood to his daughter, who was
supporting the telescope for him, but who, with ali her firmness, could not but
shudder at the sound of the cannonading, as she reflected that every shot
might be winged with death. `You are right, Hebert, I plainly saw the shot
from the broadside of the Englishman dash up the spray in long ridges full a
quarter of a mile short of the brave schooner, while her shot has knocked two
of the ports into one! God help the right.'
`Amen,' answered Henry with fervor. `God will prosper the right. See
how the merchant-man presses on to get that island between her and the
frigate!'
`Yes,' said Hebert, who was closely observing with his glass: `the frigate
is crowding sail to defeat her object and get within the schooner's fire, and is
constantly firing also single guns from her bows across the passage the ship is
steering for! This is certainly a spirited affair.'
The three vessels towards which their attention was directed with so much
anxious interest, were, as has already been hinted, an English corvette of the
smallest class, carrying about twenty guns, a large Canton merchant-man and
a privateer schooner of about one hundred and fifty tons.
About twelve o'clock at noon the merchant-man had been discovered by Col.
Hood just on the horizon, standing towards the north-west, her yards squared,
the wind being outside about a six knot breeze from the S.S.E. As it was his
custom to while away the time by watching the ocean with his spy-glass, and
amuse himself with the motions of the graceful fishing smack, and follow with
his eye the steadier advance of the larger coasting traders as they hugged the
land and dodged among the islands to avoid the cruisers that were always
prowling like wolves about the entrance of the Bay, he now went into his
`observatory' as he termed the cupola, to give his attention to the larger
vessel
,
for it had become a rare sight of late to see a large vessel approaching
Boston harbor, unless it was a British man of war running in close to the light,
to let us know `they were out,' or an American frigate returning after a short
cruise. For a merchant vessel from a foreign port to be seen on the coast was
a sight that for many weeks had not gladdened the vision of the Colonel.
Nearly every vessel that was abroad on the ocean or in foreign ports had
returned
or been captured long since, for the war had then been two years
carried
on; and no freighted vessels, unless convoyed, had for many months left
or entered the port, save at the imminent risk of capture.
The impression, therefore, of Colonel Hood on seeing this ship appear on
the horizon, that she was either a sloop of war of our country, or an English
cruiser. He consequently watched her with a great deal of interest, trying,
as she slowly lifted above the horizon line to make out her colors. When he
first discovered she was full fifteen miles distant, and her topsail yards were
below the horizon; but in less than an hour she had come up to her deck, and
soon after he was able to take in her hull. She was then about twelve miles
off, and he could see that she had no colors flying, and that she showed no sign
of having ports. In a little while afterwards he satisfied himself that she was
a large merchantman. On making this discovery and confirming it to the
satisfaction
of his own mind, his interest in her became increased; for he was
surprised at the boldness of a single ship trying to make her port in such a
dangerous time, and he well knew that an English cruiser was in the
neighborhood
,
having seen one far to the northward only four days before, but of
what class he was unable to make out. He, therefore, gave most anxious
attention
to the lonely ship and his heart throbbed with her as he saw how she
spread every yard with canvass from deck to truck, and strained, as it were,
every nerve to escape the fate which had befallen so many others as
daring
as herself.
The vessel had not shown any colors, but he was well aware from her
appearance
that she was a Boston ship. There was also an additional motive to
interest him in her; for he had long been expecting from India a dear friend,
who had been twenty years absent, and who had written some months before
that he should embark the first safe opportunity for his native land, and that
he might look for him and his daughter in the first ship that was likely to make
the passage in safety. Colonel Hood therefore thought of his friend, whom in
boyhood and youth had been like a brother in his affections and frindship, and
with the faint hope that he might be on board that very vessel he watched her
with deeper solicitude.
He had called his daughter to him, as usual to help him to hold the
telescope
and be companion for him; and never was she happier than thus doing
kindnesses for a father whom she fondly loved and whose only happiness was
centered in his children.
`If your friend should be on board, dear father,' she said with joyful
anticipation
.
`How very boisterous you'll be. There'll be no doing anything
with you!'
`You must put me in a cage, then, as you do your black crow Tom when
he forgets his propriety of demeanor,' said her father smiling. `But you will
have a friend to be noisy about too. I suspect Clara and you will be great
friends. She is just your age.'
`Four weeks younger, dear father!'
`True. A great matter, surely! I dare say you'll presume upon this
seniority
to take her under your chaperoning wing?'
`I know we shall be quite as great friends as you and Mr. Forrest, father.'
`I hope you will, dear. What so stately as a ship under full sail. How
noble she appears. What an embodiment of power and confidence in that
power.'
`Is not that another vessel further to the north?' said Mary who, without
the aid of the glass, had first discovered the object that drew the inquiry
from her.
`
Another!
' he exclaimed, directing the glass in the direction she pointed;
`Heaven forbid it should be a cruiser.'
There was a moment's silence while be bore the telescope upon the distant
sail. Miss Hood saw his countenance grow pale and that he compressed his
lip with painful earnestness.
`I hope it is not any enemy, father?'
`It
is!
There is no question of it. It is without doubt a British frigate or
sloop. She is at any rate a large vessel and no merchant vessel of that size
would be standing from the North East. Where is Hebert? He can tell us
what he thinks of her.'
His eye fell upon the young man at that moment entering the avenue gate,
with a gun on his arm, two dogs at his side and a bag of game slung across
his shoulder; and he called out to him to come up into the cupola.
`Here, east of us, Hebert, is a merchantman standing for Boston harbor;
and there, to the North East, I have just discovered another large ship.
Your eye has been practised at sea; look at her and tell me what you make
of her.'
`That ship east of us is a merchantman of the largest class: she has bright
sides and is a Boston vessel. There is no mistaking her,' he said, letting his
glass rest a moment first upon her. `And the other,' he added in a slow tone,
as he began to make her out, `the other, sir, is an armed ship!'
`I thought so! I feared so!' cried Colonel Hood, making with this only arm, a
gesture of grief and disappointment. `I thought it was too much good fortune
for one of our good ships to get fairly into port without being cut off. Is she
a frigate?'
`She is a sloop, sir, I think. But she may be one of our own ships.'
`There is no such good luck. What ships of war have we in these waters
`None, that is true. And then no sloop would be sent here when it is well
known there are frigates. She is English, sir,' he said after a moment's longer
inspection.
`Do you see her colors?'
`No. But I can tell by the shape of her sails. The English have narrower
and taller topsails, their yards not being so square as those of American ships,
nor do they rake so much as ours. She is a solid up and down sparred John
Bull, sir.'
`Then the merchantman I fear is gone. How is the enemy standing?'
`She is close-hauled on the starboard tack and is lying as nigh the wind as
she can, so that she may fetch up with the merchant-man and cut her off. The
way she is steering will bring directly across the channel to windward of the
ledge by the time the ship gets up with its entrance, that is if both keep the
same course they are now steering.
`See the ship has seen her, thank God.'
`She would have seen her before, sir, but the head of the outermost island,
perhaps, lay in range; but probably she may have seen her as soon as the
frigate
saw her; for she could do no better than she is now doing; she has
studdensails
out on both sides and even her sky-scrapers out; and from the
appearance
of the lower sails they have been wetting them. It is my opinion,
uncle, that they have been using their heels to reach port this half hour, and
no doubt saw the frigate before we discovered her.'
`But there is a fresh movement on board the ship, Hebert, as if just seeing
her. She seems all in confusion! She looks as if struck by a squal!!'
`She is taking in her studdensails and at the same time going about! She
finds, as I said, if she keeps her course she will run right into the cruiser's
jaws!'
The merchantman for two or three minutes seemed to the eye of the
unpractised
observer, to be a scene of confusion, but gradually evolving herself
from it as the studdensails on one side were hauled aboard and her yards swung
round in their slings, braced sharply up, she moved with compact and stately
symmetry on a course a little south of west, steering precisely as the frigate
steered, which, by the movement, was thrown directly astern. The ship,
however
,
could not stand on her present course long, for in less than an hour she
would have beached herself somewhere within a mile of the villa southwardly.
CHAPTER III.
THE CRUISER AND PRIVATEER.
This
change in the course of the merchant-man was watched with intense
interest by the three persons in the cupola. The British sloop of war was still
standing on her former course and the progress of the two vessels absorbed all
their attention and for a few moments kept them silent.
All at once Mary uttered a quick exclamation, and pointed towards a point
of land that made out from the main about three miles distant.
`A privateer, by the lord Harry!' exclaimed Vincent striking his hands
together
,
as he saw, on turning his eyes in that direction, a large
topsail-schooner
emerging from behind the point and steering so as, by and by, to pass
directly athwart the course of the cruiser! She was one of those large
schooners
then much used for privateering, of great length, with exceedingly taunt
masts raking very much aft and carrying enormous breadth of canvass, with a
topsail as square as that of a ship.
`Unclethe glass a moment.'
Colonel Hood handed it to him; and, after taking a close survey of her as
she went bowling away from the headland which had hitherto concealed her
approach upon the scene, he said with strong enthusiasm, `now we shall have
sport! That privateer will prove a troublesome customer to John Bull. I can
see amidships a gun almost as big as the cruiser's main mast and we may be
sure she will make her speak.'
`Has she no other guns?' asked Colonel Hood.
`She hasthree, fourfiveshe has five ports to a side. She carries ten
guns. But these can do her no service. She will depend on her long Tom;
for you may be assured her skipper means to try and protect the ship.
`Is it possible!' exclaimed Colonel Hood. `Do you really suppose,' he
asked
with surprise, taking a second survey of the schooner with his glass, Mary
having voluntarily gone down and got another for Hebert; `do you suppose
that the schoonerso small a craft as she ishas any intention of trying to
cope with the cruiser?'
`She will not be so silly as to risk a fair fight with her port guns, for the
sloop would blow her out of water if the schooner got near enough to use her
broadsides; for it is impossible she can carry guns of such weight of metal as
the sloop must carry. But her long Tom gives her a decided advantage! She
can take a position at her own distance beyond the reach of the cruiser's
thirty-two's
,
and do her much mischief; precisely as if we had a forty-two planted on
the rock point below the lawn there and we could sink the cruiser before she
could come near enough to make her own guns bear.'
`This, then is this bold little vessels policy. I am more skilled, I confess it,
in military tactics than marine, but I can see how the privateer may do the
chased ship service; but it is a daring act to attempt to step between a sloop
of war and her chase!'
`He who commands her must, without doubt, be a pretty bold fellow, for
for there are few men that would run the risk; for the cruiser might take all
her shot and stand on till she came nigh enough to sink her at a single
broadside
!'
`I hope not. I most sincerely hope not,' responded Colonel Hood with
energy.
`I know the brave American schooner will be victorious,' said Miss Hood
with patriotic emotion: `but I pray most earnestly that there will be no firing,
for it would be fearful to witness a battle and hear the roar of the cannon.'
`You are too brave a heart, dear coz,' said Hebert meeting her eyes with his
glance of deep devotion, `to fear firing You are, you know, a soldier's
daughter.'
She dropped her gaze before his intense look and blushing, smiled but made
no reply; but this little love-passage, which was unnoticed by the Colonel, told
how intimate and close still love bound her heart to her unworthy lover; for
unworthy he was to wear on his bosom so pure a gem.
`There flies a flag upon the mast of the schooner!' exclaimed the Colonel,
who continued closely to observe the movements of the vessel.
`It is a signal,' cried Hebert. `I will try and make it out. She is
telegraphing
the chase. I have a signal book in my room, and will get it.'
On his return from below, there was an answering signal flying at the main
of the merchant vessel. With his glass at his eye he was enabled, after a
little difficulty to make out that of the schooner.
`It reads,
Tack ship and pass me to windward
.'
`And the other's reply?' inquired both.
`See, cousin, in the book, what the signal is, composed of a blue and white
triangle. NoI recollect nowit stands for `signal notice.
`Then she will obey it, I hope,' said Col. Hood; for that man in the
schooner
seems to know what he is about. The schooner's signal is hauled down,
but there goes another set of them fluttering aloft.'
`Blue-white-red-red! What is it, cousin?' asked Hebert of Miss Hood,
who held the signal book open before her.
`Steer W.N.W. half N. after tacking!'
`There flies the acknowledgment from the ship again. Now it is hauled
down and--see up goes a set of fresh signals insteadfive of them. Now,
Mary, display your nautical learning!'
`What are the colors of the signals, father?'
`Hebert must tell you, for they flutter too much for my eye to fasten upon
them, though I have a most excellent glass!'
`The signal is red-white-red-blue-white!'
`Was running for the inner passagebut would thank you for a pilot,' was
the words of the rejoinder, which, with Hebert's help, she at length was
enabled
to make out and put together!
`That was then his object in putting about, when he found that he was
likely
to be cut off from the main channel, and running so far on this tack!' said
Vincent. `I could not for the life of me divine his purpose in coming this way
unless it was to run his ship dead ashore! I had no idea that a ship of her
burden would ever think of taking the inner channel by the point.'
`He could think of no other chance of getting away from his enemy: for
the sloop could not certainly follow him where it would be doubtful whether
he could pass; he would only ground his vessel at last. The merchant
captain
has shown judgment, Hebert.'
`There is no doubt he is doing his best. There must be water enough for
him, or the schooner would not have directed him to try the channel. As she
has just come through it, she probably knows what water there is; and now it
is fortunately near high water.'
`Where can that schooner have come from, so suddenly?' inquired Miss
Hood as she watched the winged life-like thing as it kept on her swift way
from the land, signalizing with the chase as she went.
`It is probable she was lying at anchor under some of the islands in the
outer harbor, and on seeing the cruiser had weighed, to watch her motions;
when discovering the ship next and thus divining her object she took the
inner channel to reach the place of junction first.'
`This is probable. When I found the ship was likely to be cut off,' said
Colonel Hood, `I was wishing that some armed ship was in Boston harbor
that I might send an express to convey information to her of the
merchantman's
peril; but I knew all were at sea; and the idea of a privateer never occurred
to me. Besides I knew not any were in the neighborhood; moreover, I should
expect a privateer to try and take the ship herself rather than protect her; for
I believe they are most of them arrant rogues. And when this war ends.
they will have so cleverly got their hand in in plundering vessels, that they
will turn from privateersmen to piratemen.'
`They never capture only British vessels, uncle. But here, the ship tacks
and now steers in the direction she was signalized to, with the wind nearly
aft again. There go her starboard studding-sails out again and she squares
away bravely. If ever I wished a vessel to get out of a scrape it is that one.'
`And look. What is that dark object on the water near the schooner? Is
it a boat?' asked the Colonel with the glass still at his eye.
`Yes. Give me that privateersman's hand in my grasp for a capital
fellow
.
He has complied with the request of the Captain of the ship and that is
his boat putting off with a pilot.'
`Do you see the boat, Mary?' said the Colonel, giving her the telescope.
`With the unaided eye it looks no bigger than a hyphen in that signal book.'
`I see it, air, and it seems to be filled with men.'
`They are the oarsmen. It is a six-oared cutter and is pulling so as to meet
the ship as she comes up towards the head-land.'
`If that schooner saves the merchantman, I will never think less than
honorably
of all privateersmen henceforward!'
The position of the three vessels in reference to each other, was now
intensely
interesting.
The cruiser without taking the least notice of the privateer was standing on
the starboard tack as from the first, close hauled and steering strait for the ship
with a dogged perseverance of purpose. The ship was crowding all sail to
reach the Head and enter the inner channel where she knew the cruiser could
not follow her; and which she seemed likely to reach unless the frigate should
put her helm up, drop off four points and try to cut her off from the head by
passing between two islands, but the schooner was running direct for the pass
between the two islands, and to reach the merchantman the privateer would
first have to be encountered. The distance from the cruiser to the
merchantship
in a right line was about three miles, and from the cruiser to the cutter
about four across the island, and from the merchantman to the schooner about
the same distance, the three vessels in their positions forming nearly a right
angle triangle, the schooner in the north west angle, the cruiser in the north
cast, the merchantman in the south west; and the wind six knot from the S. S.
E., the cruiser being on her starboard tack, the privateer on her larboard laying
jammed to the wind, and the ship nearly dead before it.
It is at this period while all three vessels are gradually shortening their
distances
one from the other, that we open the story in the first chapter with a
gun from the frigate, which when within three miles of the merchantman, she
fired across her bows as a signal for her to heave to, and taking no notice of
the schooner that was swooping down upon her from betwen the islands. The
shot which fell short was not regarded by the merchant-man, which stood
standing
on as if placing confidence in the demonstrations of the warlike little
vessel
to create a diversion in her favor. The gun from the frigate was now
replied
to by a shot from the forty-four on board the privateer, which awakened
John Bull to the considerations of a new enemy whom he had not before taken
into consideration, considering doubtless the merchant-man as his capture.
Recovering from his surprise, he returned it with a broadside for he was as he
steered, in the very position to rake the privateer; but every shot fell far short
and he had the mortification to see the forty-four come thundering aboard of
him with a force that made his frigate tremble from truck to kelson, and spread
death and devastation around.
CHAPTER IV.
THE PILOT'S BOAT.
The
relative position of, and the several courses steered by the three vessels
have, no doubt, been rendered sufficiently clear by the foregoing details. A
view of the further progress of the contest will be best obtained by joining the
party in the cupola, their number being now augmented by Henry Hood, who
had been sent for into the library by his father, with a request to join them.
We now resume the narrative of events from the point at which we took it up
in the first chapter.
The cruiser finding that the schooner would prove a formidable opponent,
and seeing that her broadsides fell short, and that her shot fired at the
merchantman
in order to cripple her did not reach her, put away a little, for she
had been steering all along close to the wind after the ship, and stood right
through the passage of the islands in which two miles distant the schooner had
taken her position to cannonade her. On this course the two ships were then
running nearly in parrallel lines, two miles and a half apart, their courses
gradually converging to a point near the Head-land; and the corvette being
the fastest sailer, had the schooner been out of the way, she would have cut
her off from the inner passage also. The merchantman crowded all sail to
gain the advantage, being protected at present by a narrow island a mile long
that lay between their lines of sailing, from her shot, though the royals of the
cruiser were visible over the land. The privateer had shortened sail and laid
her topsail to the mast when she commenced bowling her forty-four's at the
cruiser, and each moment the Englishman was now lessening the distance
between
them. The distance from the villa to the cruiser was now about four
and a half miles, and to the merchantman not more than two miles. They had
therefore, even without glasses, a clear view of the exciting scene.
`There will be warm work soon,' said Colonel Hood, with a grave and
earnest
face.
`There is no question of it,' responded Hebert. `Each moment the corvette
is getting nearer her opponent without minding his long gun, though it is doing
terrible execution on board, for I can see that every shot tells either in her
spars or hull, and there goes her foreyard down out of the sling's; and see the
topmast follows it and goes swooping with all its canvass over the side into the
sea!'
`This is surprising success for that little vessel,' said Henry, who watched
with a flushed cheek and kindling eye this novel scene. `I am surprised the
English ship should press forward so in the very face of such a destructive
missile!'
`It is her only chance. If she gets within range of the schooner she sinks
her without she takes her! I would not give three piastres for the schooner
and the lives of every soul on board if the cruiser gets near enough to make
her broadside effective.'
`How long will this be, Hebert?' asked Mary fearfully. `Oh that the brave
schooner might take care of itself.'
`I have little fears for her, for he who commands her knows well what he is
about. He has been cooly letting her advance, and aiming his shot at her
spars, knowing if he could cripple her he would stop her progress ere she could
reach him with her shot. You see she moves with less speed since the loss of
her fore-topmast.'
`Why is it, can you tell, Hebert,' asked Henry, `why the frigate is every
half minute firing a single gun from her bows, and about as often a single gun
from her quarter deck?'
`The bow-gun is `a feeler.'
`A feeler?' asked Henry with a smile.
`Yes. The shot is to the corvette eye and hand, by which she measures her
distance to her object. At every discharge an officer watches with his glass
where it strikes, and by this means they know at the earliest moment when
they get up within range! If he should see a shot strike her hull or pass through
her sails, you would instantly see her put her helm down, bring her broadside
to bear, and pour into the schooner a most deadly fire; and as the schooner
lays with about three quarter beam towards her, it would send her to the bottom.'
`What a fearful power lies in the instruments of modern warfare,' remarked
Henry Hood.
`And what skill and experience to make use of them,' said his father. `I
have made up my mind that an officer in command of a ship in action requires
more coolness, courage and decision than a military officer can possibly be
called upon to exercise in the field! In a battery indeed, his position is
something
like that of a sea-commander's; but then, he has only his battery to
defend
;
while the seaman has
his
ship to defend, to sail, to pilot out of perils, to
capture his enemies ship, and repair important damages to his spars and hull
all at once. To command a ship successfully in action, requires a
combination
of talents that few military men require to exercise, though they have
them; for there is every wit as much bravery in the army as in the navy, and
genius of the right temper. But the services are so very different that the
education
of both must be difficult. I consider Nelson by far a greater man than
Napoleon Bonaparte, for the very reasons I have given. To carry a fleet of
line of battle ships into action and win battles as Nelson did, requires a genius,
it seems to me, transcending all other human requirements!'
`This is an unusual opinion, father, for a military man to give,' said Henry.
`It is because I firmly believe it!'
`You did not say, Hebert, what the single guns were probably fired at, from
the stern, and over the lower point of the island to,' said Mary.
`At the boat that put off from the schooner! There it is in the range of that
single tree!'
`Oh, I see it now! It is near the ship! What object can they have in
trying
to destroy that mere spec!'
`That
mere spec
contains probably the very seed of the ships preservation.
The pilot is on board of her, that the privateer sent to her, in compliance with
her signals!'
`Every shot strikes near the boat,' said Henry, who, now had the glass at his
eye; and one just now struck the water within fifty yards the other side, and
then bounded and struck it a hundred rods on this side of her!'
`Could you see the shot, Henry?'
`Oh nobut I can see the spray dashed into the air wherever the shot
strikes! There are eight men in the boat, and they pull along as steadily as
if they were unconscious of or indifferent to their danger!'
`They have little fears,' answered Hebert! `They know it is no easy
matter
for a rowing boat two miles distant, to be hit by guns fired at them on the
other side of a low island; for where she is the boat is only visible from the
highest part of the enemy's quarter deck, and the gun has to be elevated and
fired like a howitser, some one giving directions how to aim, being stationed in
the rigging!'
`But they
have
hit her
!
God have mercy upon the poor fellows!' cried Col.
Hood, taking his glass from his eye and looking deadly pale. Miss Hood
clung to her brother's arm, who was still looking through the glass, and moved
her colorless lips in earnest supplication for the sufferers. Hebert had taken
the glass from Colonel Hood, who refused to look upon the painful scene.
`The boat has sunk under them! The fragments are scattered upon the
water. I can count six headsnay, seven!'
`
Only
seven?' asked the Colonel, with emotion.
`There are but seven, sir.'
`Then one poor fellow has gone. Heaven uphold these!'
`Count, them, Edward,' cried Mary Hood.
`There are
but
seven, sister,' he said sadly. `They are swimming manfully
and will yet have succor from the ship which is bearing towards them, and is
not a quarter of a mile distant.'
`The ship is letting down her boats! I see the men leaping into them!
There they are afloat and now pulling ahead of the ship. Fear not, they will
all be saved!'
`But the poor fellow that is gone,' said Mary sorrowfully.
`But he has not gone! I see eight persons in the water and have counted
them twice,' cried Henry.
`See, Hebert. Do you make out the same number?' eagerly asked the
Colonel.
`Yes, sir. There are as many in the water as there were in the boat.'
`Then praised be God!' fervently ejaculated the Colonel.
`Oh joy, joy! This is indeed a relief,' cried Mary, taking her father's hand,
and throwing an arm around his neck she kissed him with an emotion that
found vent in a gush of tears; so strong is the sympathy that exists between
human life and human life.
In a few minutes they had the happiness to see every one of the swimmers
taken out of the water by the crew of the merchantman's boat, which they
beheld
soon after taken on board; the ship in the meanwhile not having
shortened
sail or altered her course in the least.
`Now, we must see more mischief done, I fear, said Colonel Hood, `but it
will not be so palpable to us as the destruction of this little boat. In five
minutes the merchantman will have passed beyond the protection of the
intervening
island, and as the course of the corvette is converging towards hers
every instant, and as she knows she can now reach her if she could reach the
boat, we may soon expect warm work for the poor unprotected ship.'
`Yes; that is if the privateer will give her consent,' responded Hebert!
`As the cruiser approaches her, more slowly than before you see, on account
of having her fore-top-mast shot away, the schooner retires stretching away on
the wind westward, gradually nearing the ship.'
`At the same time what a deliberate and terrific firing of her huge gun she
keeps up.'
`Yes, and that Long Tom will serve the merchantman yet. The corvette
gets at least three iron forty-two's a minute somewhere about her hull or
hamper
.
Two of her ports are already knocked into one. Her fore-top-mast, with
the whole of her fore-top-mast hamper, has gone by the board, and I can see
that full three fathoms of her hammock nettings with as much of her
bulwarks
on her larboard quarter are shot away. If the cruiser gets one of them
shot between wind and water, her men will have no rations given out
to-morrow
,
nor no need of hammocks to-night.'
`Yet she stands fearlessly on.'
`If the captain is a true British tar, he will stand on so long as two timbers
hold together. He knows it would be infamy to let a privateer with a Long
Tom cut him off from a rich prize.'
`I fear for the bold schooner!' said Mary Hood who, in spite of the terrible
associations of such a scene, was deeply interested in every movement of the
vessels, her whole sympathies as well as those of all present deeply enlisted
both for the schooner and merchantman.
`There the merchantman has it,' suddenly cried Hebert as a range of bright
flashes and belching smokes from the cruiser's side told them that she had
opened upon the chase. It was an instant before the roar of the co-mingled
explosions of so many guns reached their ears. The sound in itself was grand
and awful, like thunder rolling; but as they felt that death must be borne up
on it to many a life, they heard it with a shudder, and with solemn looks.
Hebert, however, may be excepted from this remark; for he experienced no
other feeling than that of strong and enthusiastic excitement.
All eyes were turned to the ship to witness the effect of the shot.
`It has not hurt her!' said Hebert with an oath of surprise and pleasure.
`Nephew, you forget this is not a ship's deck,' said his uncle.
`I am reproved,' he answered with a light laugh.
`I can discover two shot holes in her upper sails,' said Henry who was
closely
observing the merchantman with his glass.
`I see them! They aimed too high. They will discover the fault and
depress
their guns the next fire.'
`Oh, I hope they will not fire again,' said
Miss
Hood, shrinking.
`They will coz, unless the ship strikes.'
`She has shown no colors,' said the Colonel. `That looks as if she did not
intend to strike.'
`There they go to her peakthe stars and stripes! That is wise in her, for
she must have something to show when she strikes.'
`Do you think she has hoisted them for fear she must yet strike to her enemy?
asked Henry. `It looks to me like bravado and defiance.'
`It may be a little of that too. Look now at that schooner. Her colors she
is now showing for the first time!'
There are threeone under the other. It is a signal,' said Col. Hood.
`No sir! That fellow is a cool one. The upper is the American flag; the
next under it is a red flag with some private mark in the centre, and the one
under all is the red cross of King George and merry England!'
`That is a daring insult to the corvette!' exclaimed Colonel Hood.
`It is, and I will tell you, uncle, who has dared to do it. That middle flag
there is now no mistaking. It is Freemantle's the celebrated Privateersman!
`I might have guessed it from the very first.'
`Freemantle! I have heard of him as one of the most successful and bold
cruisers we have had on the ocean during the war.'
`It is the man. That is his private signal which I have heard he carries.
It is a cavalier's mantle, worked (in gold thread, they say) upon a crimson
ground, and represented as if borne by the wind through the air.'
`A singular device.'
`It has something to do with the circumstances by which his ancestors got
their name. Now that he is here I am quite sure the corvette will have her
match. There goes another of his bowling balls into her!'
`And there thunders another broadside into the merchant-man!'
`See!what a crash and tumbling of her upper masts and sails!' cried
Henry.
`I fear she will be taken spite of bold Freemantle,' exclaimed Mary,
clasping
her hands and gazing earnestly upon the cloud of battle that rolled over
the wave and hid the cruiser.
`There goes a gun,' he exclaimed; `twothree of them from the
merchant-man
.
But they are small, and can do no more service than quakers. It shows
spirit, however.'
`And there, at the same time, goes her flag down,' said Colonel Hood.
`She has fired and
struck!
' cried Hebert with an oath of surprise and
vexation
;
`Freemantle for once has been foiled.'
CHAPTER V.
THE `LONG TOM.'
The
merchantman had, indeed, struck her flag to the corvette, as if
despairing
further of any successful aid from the privateer. The latter,
nevertheless
,
continued to pour the heavy fire from her `Long Tom,' into the
Englishman
,
who although within reach, with his shot, of the ship, was yet too
far distant from the privateer to do her any injury. When it was seen that
the merchant vessel had really lowered her flag, there was a general
exclamation
of sympathetic indignation from the small party with whom we have been
watching the progress of the chase.
`The affair is now up,' said the Colonel, with a countenance of deep sorrow
and vexation. `The poor people, on board there, instead of going in safety
into port to meet their friends, are to be borne over the sea again to Halifax or
England as prisoners.'
`Oh, how cruel, that men can be such enemies to each other,' exclaimed
Miss Hood.
`It is, however, the chance of war,' added the Colonel. `They risked their
lives and liberty, by venturing forth upon the ocean, knowing that it was
covered
with the enemie's cruisers. They have met with a fate they must have
been looking for daily. But my heart bleeds for them one and all.'
`And if dear Clara Forrest and her father should be on board,' cried Mary,
clasping her hands together and turning pale with the thought.
`God forbid,' responded the Colonel, heartily. `But there is no hope. But
see the schooner. She is bearing down for the merchantman.'
`She will soon be under the Englisnman's fire if she continues on in this
course,' said Henry, `How fearfully exciting. The two vessels are now
converging
to a focus which is the ship.'
`The corvette is standing on to take possession of the prize,' remarked
Hood with deep interest as he surveyed the new movements of the vessels,
and the schooner seems trying to cut her off.'
`She has ceased firing, also,' exclaimed Henry.
`And the corvette, also. But she is only reserving her fire till the rash
privateersman comes within full range. Mark me, Hebert, in less than ten
minutes we shall see that privateer either sunk or blown into the air. She is
the boldest in her movements of any thing I ever saw on the water. The man
who commands her is either as brave as a lion or a mad-man! But where is
Hebert?' suddenly exclaimed Colonel Hood, looking round and finding him
gone; for the three had been too deeply interested in what was going on upon
the water to notice his disappearance, which had taken place as soon as he
saw the merchantman lower her colors.
There he is, sir,' cried Miss Hood. `See. Is he not launching the boat.'
And she pointed to a small pier about a furlong from the villa. There they
saw Hebert in a boat and evidently, from his gestures trying to prevail upon
two or three men, who was standing by, to get into the boat with him. But
they refused, and he pushed off alone and with two oars began to row rapidly
from the shore in the direction of the vessels. When Mary saw this she would
have yielded to her first impulse and hastened to detain him. But she
restrained
feelings which she felt would displease her father; but covering her
face with her hands she stood trembling and praying for his safety.'
`He is mad,' cried Colonel Hood, after the first emotions of surprise. `The
boy is mad. What can be his motive?'
`I cannot conceive, sir. He is pulling for the merchantman. Can he hope
to do any thing to save her?'
`He is mad, I tell you. He is . Well, let him go. A cannon-ball
through his body would help him, I dare say.'
`Oh, father. You forget that he is your nephew,' said Mary. `Cannot you
send some one to bid him return?'
`No, let him go. Let us wait and see the end of it.'
`But he will be killed.'
`No danger, not a bit. He never'll die on the water or by a cannon ball.
I fear he'll live to give some honest hangman trouble some day.'
Miss Hood made no reply, but after a moment's longer stay in the cupola
she descended to her room, where she could not only give full vent to her
feelings, but, also watch with tearful eyes and a throbbing heart the dangerous
progress of her lover in the direction of the belligerent vessels.
The little boat took its solitary way swiftly over the waters; but as it farther
left the land its course became more northwardly and at length strait for the
privateer, leaving the ship on the right. Colonel Hood and Henry watched
it closely with their glasses. Hebert could be distinctly seen seated upon the
centre thwart of the boat pulling strongly and steadily, at intervals turning his
face to see how the bows of his boat were directed. The schooner in the
meanwhile was standing down under press of sail in a direction that would by
and by intercept him, and which would bring her between the ship and
corvette
.
At length they saw him reach the privateer and be taken on board
while his boat was dropped astern. Five minutes afterwards the schooner had
run so far southwardly as to set between the merchantman and corvette, and
for a moment all these vessels lay in a direct line as seen from the cupola, the
schooner in the middle. Here she threw her foretopsail to the mast and hove
to, and opened her fire upon the corvette, who was standing towards her.
`Never was such a bold and daring thing done before,' exclaimed Colonel
Hood, with surprise and admiration. `That Freemantle is more of a free
devil. But he must be a generous fellow to risk so much to protect the weak.'
`There must be some particular motivesome inducement more than usual
which leads him to take such an interest in the safety of this merchantman,'
said Henry.
`It would seem so! or else it is done from mere recklessness. It is
impossible
he can save the ship or himself. See the corvette is keeping away instead
of standing strait on. I see. It is because the heavy fire of the privateer's
gun rakes her fore and aft.
`There is another motive, sir,' cried Henry. `Do you not see she has brought
her broad-side round to bear full upon the two vessels in her range.'
`Yes, I see it. She means to pour in'
His words were interrupted by the sight of a dozen bright flashes from the
side of the ship of war, by clouds of smoke exploding from her ports, and the
heavy thunder of her larboard broadside as she discharged it all at once upon the
schooner and upon her prize.
Colonel Hood's glass was instantly at his eye and watching the effect; for
painful as the associations were with such a scene, he was most deeply
interested
in it. Even Henry Hood, the sedentary student gazed upon the combat
with a kindling eye, and a heightened color in his cheeks, the firm lip which
told of the slumbering spirit within, that, under other circumstances of
education
,
would have led him to eminence in the field or in the naval service.
`The ship has suffered most, sir,' he exclaimed. The schooner is unhurt.'
`Yes, it would seem so. She is so low in the water that the enemy's shot
have passed over her.'
`And the ship on this side has got the whole broadside. See her
fore-topmast
shot away and the holes through her sails.'
`Mr. Privateer Freemantle is doing the ship more mischief than benefit.
They will thank him to stop his interference.'
`See! he is pressing sail again and passing out of the range of the ship.
And the sloop is wearing to give him another broadside. He is now just clear
of the merchantman's range. He sees his first error. Now Heaven help him
this time, for the Englishman will depress his pieces and aim accurately.
Hebert
will now have his heart's content of powder and ball.'
The schooner had made sail again, and passed further south astern of the
ship on the
starboard
tack, and therefore on a course that brought her nigher
to the ship of war, which was wearing so as to bring her starboard broadside
to bear upon her antagonist. The privateer every quarter of a minute had
discharged
her large gun until the corvette began to wear, when there was a
silence
as if she intended to receive the broadside quietly. But as the ship of
war wore round, there was a space of time of several seconds, during which
her stern would necessarily be presented to the schooner; for in wearing be
it known to the uninitiated reader, the ship described with her bows the arc of
half a circle, so as to bring the opposite guns in the position which those that
had just been fired, had held. In this manuvre, her stern would lay for an
instant in range so that a shot well aimed from the schooner would rake her,
that is, go through her
lengthwise
, the most dangerous and destructive manner
by which a cannon ball can come aboard of a ship.
The Corvette as she began to wear was not half a mile distant from the
privateer
which, as we have said, was running free on her starboard tack, laying
her course about East, half South, and moving along five knots by the log, her
four course up! The merchant ship still lay to astern of her, where she had
surrendered about a third of a mile distant nearer the land. The corvette
was in the north eastern board, and the space between her and the ship was
less than a mile in a straight line.
`The disadvantage at which the Englishman would lie, for a few seconds,
in the manuvre of wearing ships was not likely to escape the observations of
so skillful a seaman as the commander of the privateer had shown himself
to be.
From the cupola, we will now transfer our readers more nearly to the
scenes we are describing, and place them upon the deck of the schooner at
the moment the Corvette begins to fall off, for the purpose of bringing her
starboard
guns round.
The schooner is full of men, not less than one hundred being visible within
her bulwarks and aloft. She has ten guns mounted on oaken carriages, five
on a side; men are stationed at each, but the tompions are not out, nor the
ports open, save one, which a shot from the Englishman entered, killing the
captain of the gun, and lodging in the hammock nettings just forward of the
weather gangway. Gangs of men are posted at different points about the
vessel
to be ready to obey any order appertaining to the sailing of her; and
perfect
order and coolness characterised their conduct. Amidships just forward
of the main hatch, which, in this vessel, situated a few feet farther aft than
usual, was
suspended
in a massive frame of oak and iron, the enormous gun
whose thunder, at intervals, had given notice of the engagement for many a
league inland and seaward. It was eleven feet in length, painted black and
bound with hoops made of bars of iron. Upon its head near the vent was
painted in red letters `The Conqueror!'
This enormous mass was suspended by chains and cordage, and adjusted in
its position in the nicest manner. It was levelled, and raised or depressed for the
purpose by means of an instrument, similar in shape, and construction to a
quadrant
.
At every discharge it would rebound in its swing without injury to the
vessel, which, if it had been mounted upon a carriage it would in a little while
have dismembered from the force of the re-action. Its elevation was at about
two and half feet above the deck; but the bulwarks were lowered in front of
it to give free sight at the objects it was directed upon. A dozen men, with
brawny, naked arms and breasts, their faces black with powder, and their
features
bearing the stern impress of men in battle, stood around it. Some of
them were passing cartridges the size of a gallon keg, others were rolling
along enormous iron globes too heavy to be lifted by one man; others were
busy at loading, priming, and at the adjusting tackle. Some of the men had
blood on their clothes, and one of them had his arm in a sling; for the
broadside
of the corvette had not, as was supposed in the cupola, passed harmlessly
by her; three men having been killed, and five wounded, as well as a shot
received
between wind and water that rendered it necessary to keep the pumps
agoing until the hole it made could be stopped. At the head of the gun stood
one who, by his bearing and appearance, was evidently the master spirit of all
this stirring scene. But we will not give to him the ending of a chapter.
CHAPTER VI.
THE FLAG OF TRUCE.
The
personage alluded to at the close of the last chaper, was a young man
of slight figure and certainly not more than three and twenty. His face was
very handsome and exceedingly youthful; but the expression of his brilliantly
grey eagle eyes, and the firm character of his mouth, with a general air of
decision
and resolute daring in his appearance, showed that he was not young in
action or in the experiences of an adventurous life.
He wore upon his head a serviceable blue cloth cap adorned with a gold
band, and a short navy-blue round-about, with gold!ace upon the shoulder and
anchor buttons thickly placed together. He was without a vest, displaying a
full linen bosom frilled after the Spanish fashion. His white ample trowsers
were secured by a polished black belt buckled around his waist, to which hung
by gilt chainlets a short Moorish scabbard, the sabre belonging to it being
held beneath his arm. He had a fair complexion somewhat sun-browned, and
fair hair inclining to auburn; and although it was naturally a mass of the
richest
tresses, it was now worn thrust back from his cap and temples in a bold
negligent style, that had a striking effect in displaying more fully the resolute
expression and manly beauty of his finished profile.
He was standing at the breech of the gun taking sight along the enormous
tube. By his side stood a youth apparently not more than sixteen or
seventeen
,
with large eyes, as dark as an Arabian's, but with remarkable ugliness
of figure and feature. He was looking intensely into the face of the other,
while all other eyes were watching the corvette as she wore slowly. In his
hand he held the lighted match. Near him, with his hand grasping a part of
the massive frame that supported the huge gun, was a seaman, a man of large
stature, and a countenance expressive of mingled bravery and good-nature;
doubtless once an old-man-of-war's-man. This man directed the movements
of the apparatus of the gun. A little to the left of him was Hebert Vincent,
closely watching the corvette.
`A very little down,' said the youthful personage we have described,
speaking
in a low, self-possessed tone of voice.'
`Down a little it is, sir,' responded the man-of-wars-man depressing the
sight.
`A hair's breadth to the right.'
`It is, sir.'
`Steady, now,' he said in the same low, quiet tone as if conversing above the
head of a slumbering infant he did not wish to wake.
`Steady 'tis, sir,' answered the bluff seaman.
The young man let his eye range once more along the sight of the piece.
He then raised his head, slightly waved his hand for all to stand aside, and, in
silence, took the lighted match from the hand of the black-eyed youth. All
eyes were now fixed upon the corvette. The schooner itself was stationary,
having been hove to three minutes before and the direction of the gun
therefore
remained pointed exactly as it was sighted, with that fatal accuracy of
aim which distinguished him who himself had now levelled it.
Slowly the corvette swung round. Gradually her stern began to present
itself. Every eye was rigid, every tongue mute, every noise hushed on board
the privateer. The stern of the Englishman's ship now lies in full view; her
three
masts and bowsprit are in a single line. Every eye is turned
instinctively
towards the young man who stands at the breech of the gun. Every look
tells him that the instant is comeis passing. A smile is seen upon his lips
a smile of triumph and conscious power. He glances rapidly along the gun,
ignites the match by sweeping it round in the air above his head and then
lightly lets it descend upon the powder.
The little vessel trembled in every beam at the discharge. The decks were
enveloped in a cloud of thick smoke and the iron missile went upon its
message
of death and devastation.
`My Goddo you see that?' exclaimed Colonel Hood, turning to Henry.
`That shot has saved the schooner. If I had that Freemantle here I could hug
him to my heart!'
`See, sir! The next mast has also broken off and gone!
`Yes; and I hope the foremast will go also! That was a shot such as was
never fired before. I could plainly hear the crashing of its entrance into the
stern even here!'
The sound had not only reached their ears but those of all on board the
schooner, even before the smoke that enveloped her would let them see the
effect
.
The young man, on firing the piece, had calmly walked aft, as if
confident
of the result, and while others sprung aloft to overlook the smoke, he
merely gave the order to brace round, and leant over the quarter as quietly as
if he had only lighted a cigar instead of a gun charged with so much mischief.
As soon as the schooner was under motion again and had sailed out of her
smoke, he saw what his shot had done.
`It must have passed right through his centre cabin-window,' he said
laughing
,
turning to Hebert Vincent.
`Yes, and passing through his cabin cut off his mizzen-mast between decks,
for it has gone by the board with all its hamper.'
`And wounded his main-mast also,' said Freemantle; `for it begins to sway
this way and that as if it would follow the mizzin!'
`And there it goes yards and all, toppling over into the sea,' shouted
Hebert
;
while a hundred voices sent up a loud hurra from the decks of the
schooner
which was answered by the crowds on the beach and heights of land.
The devastation which this single globe of iron caused, cutting through both
the after masts, so that one and then the other went by the board, tearing up the
decks, demolishing the bulwarks and entangling the men and guns with the
falling rigging and sails, part of which fell upon them, this unprecedented
destruction
in addition to the great loss of life which must always follow a
raking
shot, prevented the corvette not only from completing the manuvre of
wearing, but rendered her perfectly stationary upon the water, her stern still
presented to the schooner. Thus with her foremast alone standing with the
loss of its royal-mast which the main had dragged with it in its fall, and with
the wreck of her masts hanging over her sides, one on each quarter, she lay
perfectly at the mercy of the schooner, not having a single gun that she could
bring to bear upon her.
`One more shot and you sink her!' cried Hebert placing his hand on
Freemantle's
arm. `She is at our mercy.'
`And the merchantman at hers. That broadside she was swinging round to
give me, she will drive into that ship.
And if she does, I sink her and every soul
on board
.'
The young privateersman spoke in a tone that could not have been heard
three yards distant, but it was more impressive than if he had shouted it so as
to have reached the ears of his foe.
`How can you help it sir? The merchantman is within point blank range,
and she will be sure to fire into her as soon as she gets clear of the wreck of
her masts and sails that now cover her guns!'
`Lower away the cutter! Lively!' he cried, giving the order with
earnestness
.
`Place a white flag up in the stern upon a staff!'
`Gig's, away!' called out the boatswain; and in less than a minute the
captain's gig was lowered, and along side with a flag of truce flying above the
coxswains head!
`Lay her to, Mr. Flint!' he said, to his next in command, as he sprung into
the boat, `and if she fires into the ship blow her out of the water; but on no
account fire unless she does so. If she sees my flag she will wait to know
what I want before she fires! I would send up signals at once, but she may
not be able to read them! I had better go!'
The boat was now swiftly flying over the water from the schooner in the
direction
of the corvette. Freemantle stood up in the stern-sheets with his
spy-glass
at his eye watching anxiously the progress they made in clearing the
wreck of the masts upon that side which lay towards the merchantman. He
expressed his thoughts to Hebert who accompanied him in the boat.
`They seem to have every man engaged, and in three minutes they will cut
all clear from the side and then they can use their guns. As they can't bring
them to bear on me, they will be sure to avenge themselves upon the
merchantman
,
unless I can get nigh enough to hail, or they see my flag of truce and
wait my coming up. But I have given them so hard a blow that they will be
little likely to heed a white flag. But if they do fire, I will make her a target
for my long gun until I sink her, or she sinks me!'
`You have acted very boldly in this defence of the merchantman,' said
Hebert. `But I think you showed more boldness in venturing so nigh the
Englishman now!'
`If you fear, you should not have come!'
`If I feared, I never should have boarded your schooner,' answered
Hebert
,
with a flushed cheek.
`Nay, never be angry. I know you to be brave, Vincent! Do me the
favor
to wave that flag aloft! I fear they will not see it.'
`Yes, and it is answered. There flies one above their taffrail,' cried Hebert
`Then the ship is safe,' exclaimed Freemantle with a look of pleasure'
Bend to your oars men.'
When the English captain saw the extent of the mischief the shot from the
privateer had done, and beheld first one and then another mast go by the
board with everything set, he stood a moment upon the poop in an attitude
of astonishment and despair. In one moment his gallant ship had been made
a wreck. The shrieks of the wounded that followed the passage of the
cannon
ball through the bowels of his vessel, the crashing of the masts, the
rending
of the cordage, the confused shouts of his men seemed to paralyse him.
In the dead silence that followod the crashing he recovered himself, and
seeing
that his foremast stood, he swore vengeance both upon the schooner and
merchantman.
`The infernal Yankee shall pay for this,' he thundered. `All hands to clear
away the wreck. Get the guns free and give the ship the broadside. I will
sink her if I cant the infernal schooner. A pretty condition this for one of
His Majesty's ships to be placed in by a privateer clipper that would serve for
a frigate's first cutter. If I can then get a second broadside to bear, I'll give
it to the schooner.'
`We are now lying at the mercy of the Yankee, sir, `said his first
lieutenant
.
`If we fire into the ship he will send another shot into us.'
`He may as it is.'
`Then we had best display a flag of truce.'
`To a privateer-schooner.'
`It is the only way of saving the corvette, sir. It will take ten minutes
before
we can work the larboard guns so as to fire a broadside into the merchant
vessel.'
The captain took his glass, surveyed the schooner a moment, and then
said
`You are right, Everby. I will hoist a flag of truce and then send him
word that if he will withhold his fire I will not fire into the merchantman.'
`That is the best course, sir. For we shall be for ten minutes to come
wholly in his power.'
`True and another such a thunderbolt will send us to father Neptune's
lower regions. That shot came aboard of us as if the devil himself had sent
it. I would give a little to know what chap is in command of that imp of a
schooner.'
`He has shown himself daring and skilful beyond all men that I ever
encountered
.
The idea of his presuming to interfere with a twenty gun sloop
in her chase.'
`None but a dd Yankee privateersman would ever have thought of it.
But hold on. Stop that flag going up!' cried the captain. `I see a boat
leaving
her with a white flag flying astern.
`So much the better. We dont have to show it first.'
`Acknowledge it, when they get a little nearer, Mr. Everby. By the rod of
Moses, they come bravely on. Now I shall see my man. Think you he will
dare come aboard?'
`He seems to be pulling strait for us. It is a mere youthhe who is
stauding
up.'
In a few minutes the boat came so near that the Englishman laid aside his
glass and took his trumpet in his hand.
CHAPTER VII.
THE CUTTER.
`
Flag
ahoy!' shouted the Englishman through his trumpet; having first said
to his lieutenant in an under tone, `I will be first to hail and so not let them
suspect we fear them or want their flag to fly for us.'
`Ho, the corvette!' called Freemantle without regarding the hail; `ho, the
corvette.'
`Well, the devil!' exclaimed the English captain, to the officers around him,
`that is cool enough. I should think he was hailing me from a three-decker.
The fellow has no beard. The Privateer captain has sent his clerk. I'll
teach him how to hail one of his majesty's ship in this fashion.Ho, the cutter
ahoy! Pull along side,' he commanded in an authoritative tone.
`I have only to say to you, sir Englishman,' answered Freemantle in a clear
tone of voice that was distinctly heardevery syllable of it, `I have pulled up
to you only to say that, seeing your guns command the merchantman, if you
dare to fire into her I will sink you.'
`The deuce you will!' answered the captain of the sloop looking pale, but
laughing derisively. `Go back and tell your captain or skipper that I shall
fire into the ship and into his schooner just so soon as I get my guns clear.'
`I am the master of that schooner, sir, and I repeat the words,' answered the
young man in the same resolute tone. My gun is now trained on you; and
you have already felt its effects. The moment I strike this flag, that instant
you will receive another one of my agreeable visiting cards. I give you
thirty
seconds to make up your mind.' Here the Privateersman took out his
watch.
`Cool
very!
confound him!' answered the captain turning with surprise to
look into the faces of the officers.
`We are certainly at the mercy of the schooner,' said his first lieutenant,
Everby. `One more shot like that last would do for us.'
`I shall have to give the promise not to fire. What a decided villain he is,
and not even a beard. Flag ahoy!'
`Corvette!'
`I would first know if
you
are the commander of that schooner?'
`Yes. Are you ready to give the promise not to fire?' he asked holding up
his watch.
`Yes, if you will promise on your part to cease firing.'
`That I promise. You are to make no further efforts to take possession of
the merchantman.'
`I am not? That is not in the bargain!' answered the Englishman angrily
`But I make it in the bargain. It is my request that you cease all further
hostilities towards the ship.'
`A very modest request,' answered the captain with an oath.
`Yes, and one I shall enforce. I know that you lie at my mercy, wrecked
as you are. Either make the promise to cease all hostile acts towards the ship,
or in less than five seconds I shall make the signal which will bring another
one of my shot into your cabin windows.'
`There is no alternative, captain Duncanlee,' said two or three of his elder
officers, seeing him hesitate, as if half resolved to let his vessel be destroyed
before giving a promise that showed so plainly his own weakness and the
other's
power. To be conquered as it were, and have his prize taken from before
his eyes by a little schooner commanded by a mere youth, seemed to him a
degredation that no British officer could survive with honor.
`I have no time to lose, sir,' called out the young privateersman
imperatively
;
and as he spoke he elevated the flag in his hand as if about to depress it
to the water as the signal for firing the sixty-four pounder.
`I promise, then, you infernal Yankee!' shouted the English Captain.
Freemantle bowed and smiled, waved his hand in polite adieu, and
re-placing
the flag in the stern of his boat he gave the order to pull on board the
merchantman, which lay directly abeam of the corvette, about three cables'
length or a third of a mile distant.
`I have not been too prompt, Hebert,' said Freemantle smiling as he
reealled
the fury and chagrin of the English captain, whose tremendous oaths
followed
him and his boat; `you see they have got seven of their guns clear from
the sails and rigging that overhung the side, and before we reach the
merchantman
,
her broadside will be gaping wide open upon us.'
`If he had had his ports clear when you first hailed him, I believe his reply
would have been the discharge of his whole broadside into the prize,' said
Hebert gazing back upon the dismasted vessel of war.
`I think it more than likely. But as he could not fire them, the delay
enabled
me to bring him to terms. He well knows that, as he lays, he is in my
power.'
`Yet if he could bring his guns to bear upon the schooner, there is no
question
but he would riddle her like a seive. See, sir, he is getting out two boats
ahead. That can be only to tow her head round to take the schooner.'
`That is quite likely his intentions. I made him give no promise not to fire
upon my vessel, nor did I care to. I can take care of my own craft! Yet he
is pulling his ship round to square her on the schooner, there is now no doubt.
`And will you let him fire into her? If he gets the schooner abeam he wont
mind her big gun so much: and you lose your power.'
Freemantle mused an instant, then ordered the men to back-water; and
seizing his trumpet he hailed the Englishman:
`Call your boats aboard, sir!'
`I'm dd if I do!' thundered back the Captain of the corvette.
`You see your crippled condition! I can improve it with one motion of my
hand towards my schooner. If you chose to haul off as you are and take care
of yourself, you are at liberty to go unmolested. But touch fire to one of your
guns aimed either at the schooner or ship, and I will see that you never get
clear of this bay. There are three or four heavy privateers in Boston harbor
and Salem, which the noise of all this cannonading will bring down here. Nay,
if you will look to the northward you will see a topsail schooner already
rounding
the point of that island two leagues to the north! I give you good advice,
and you will do well to take it. It is true you may do me mischief, but you
will be paid back with interest before you can get your ship, crippled as she
is, off soundings.'
`It must be done, or it will be as he says,' said Captain Duncanlee, turning
to his officers. `What do you make of that schooner in the northern board,
Mr. Everby, with the glass?'
`An armed schooner filled with men! and to windward of her heaves in
sight a schooner-brig, that from her square canvass and rake is a privateer!'
`The fellow told the truth. A bee isn't much of a bird, but when they
begin
to sting they are troublesome. These fellows are small but they carry
stings that do an infernal sight of mischief. We must do now as boys do
when they put their foot into a hornet's nest, turn backs and run for it!'
`Shall I call the boat in, sir?'
`Yes, Mr. Everby; and the curse of Cromwell light on this young Yankee.'
The boats which had been sent out with lines attached to the end of the
jib-boom
,
for the purpose of bringing her bows round, to square her against the
schooner, were now ordered along side, and Captain Duncanlee gave orders
for men to go to work to rig jury-masts. The head sails, her only canvass,
were braced up, and by means of a stay-sail bent upon a stay, which they
passed from the head of the foremast to the weather main chains, they
succeeded
in a few minutes in getting the corvette under steering weigh before
the wind. Half of the crew were employed in rigging jury masts, and the
rest in lifting on board and saving the yards, topsails, top-gallant-sails and
coursers, which had been cut away from the guns, and now lay in the water
along side impeding her way.
As soon as Freemantle saw the boats called in he resumed his seat in the
stern-sheets of his boat, and gave the order for his men to pull again towards
the merchant-ship.
Hebert sat for a few moments gazing in silent astonishment upon the serene
face of the young privateersman, whose coolness and quiet daring had
achieved
so much. He wondered as much at the indifference which he displayed to
his extraordinary acts of intrepidity, as at the acts themselves. Certainly,
thought he, he is the most extraordinary person I ever beheld; and as he
gazed
on him a feeling of rivalry, a spirit of ambition took possession of his
bosom
;
and under its influence he spoke:
`Noble Freemantle, from this moment I cast my fortunes in with you. Your
life is such as I would love to lead. You know I have been dismissed from
the service; but it was because I loved too well! I am weary of this idle life
ashore; and if you will give me a position in the privateer I am yours.'
The young privateersman smiled slightly. It was neither an expression of
pleasure, nor was it exactly one of contempt; but it was a combination of two
emotions. Hebert did not see it, for at the same instant a cannon-ball flew,
whizzing over their heads and struck the water, dashing it high into the air,
not twenty yards ahead of them. Hebert had dodged involuntarily; but the
young privateersman betrayed no other emotion than a quick, stern glance in
the direction of the corvette, and a look upon his face as if waiting to see if a
second would be fired; at the same time he raised the flag of truce in the air
ready to dash it at his feet! The answering flag was waved several times
from the quarter deck of the corvette, and every port instantly closed.
`It was an accident, or else finding they missed their aim, they are willing
to be quiet again,' he said, resuming his seat. `You are welcome to sail with
me, Mr. Hebert,' he answered, as if nothing had occurred between the
proposal
of the latter, and his reply. `But I have, as you have already seen, the
strictest subordination on board my vessel. It may not please you!'
`What birth will you give me?'
`That of my first officer, if you like it. Mine is about to leave me! I know
you are a brave man and good sailor; and I hope we shall agree.'
`I will go with you, sir!'
`Now?'
`I will come on board in Boston to-morrow, as you say you return there
tonight
.'
`Be it so!'
The movements of the boat had been watched from the merchantman with
the deepest interest and curiosity. The conference between the persons they
beheld standing up in her, and the captain of the corvette they had not heard;
but they witnessed the progress of things with the most painful solicitude.
Each moment they had feared that their captor might fire into them in revenge
for the damage done by the schooner to him; and the shout of pleasure with
which the sight of the toppling masts gave them, was checked by the fears of
retributive vengeance upon themselves.
Upon the quarter deck of the ship paced to and fro the captain, with his
glass in his hand, and his countenance full of sorrow and mortification. Amid
ships the mates were at work clearing away and repairing damages made by
the shot of the corvette, when she discharged her broadside into her across
the schooner. She had lost her fore-top-gallant mast and royal yard, received
three shot in her hull, and two or three through her main topsail as it lay back
to the mast; for all this while the merchantman was laying to, as at the first,
awaiting her destiny. She was a very large ship, quite as large as the
corvette
,
but her six guns were of small calibre and badly mounted; and one of
these lay across the main hatch, its carriage shivered to pieces by a shot that
entered the port and dismounted it. There was also several spots of blood
upon the decks, showing that death had been there as well as on board the
other two vessels.
Not far from the captain stood a tall slender man, of a gentlemanly presence.
He was about fifty years of age, with a dark Indian complexion, and an
expression
of intelligence animating his fine face. His countenance was now anxious
and he was watching the advance of the little boat with intense interest.
`I should like to know who that privateersman is that has come in so
gallantly
to my aid,' cried the captain of the merchantman, stopping and looking
over the quarter; `and I should like to know what he has been pulling under
the stern of the corvette for. He is a bold, brave fellow, but he did us a
mischief
in coming between us and the enemy, and giving us the benefit of the
shot meant for him.'
`So long as it did us so little mischief, Captain Niles,' replied the
gentleman
,
`I am not sorry that we got it instead of the schooner. So near as she
was it would have sunk her; and he deserved to escape for his gallantry and
courage! Certainly no man could ever come up to another's rescue with more
skill and generosity than he has done, to say nothing of the cool intrepidity he
has displayed from the very first. But for him, we should have been now
involuntary
guests on board the Englishman.'
`And we are likely to be still, Mr. Forrest,' said the Captain. `I have
struck, and the schooner can do us now no good; for we are as completely in
the power of the corvette as if she had not lost her masts! But I must see to
receiving this boat? Who is that youth on board, pilot?' he asked of the
privateer's
pilot, whom Freemantle had sent in the boat which had been stove by
the cannon-ball and sunk.
`It is the captain of the schooner, sir.'
`That youth,' exclaimed Mr. Forrest.
`He is a man every inch of him, sir,' answered the pilot in a tone of pride.
The next moment the cutter was along side, and Freemantle stood upon the
deck of the merchantman.
CHAPTER VIII.
THE FLIGHT.
`
You
will hoist your colors again, Captain,' was the command of the young
privateersman as he placed his foot upon the deck.
The Captain of the prize ship stared at his youthful visitor for a moment
with surprise and then replied
`I have struck, sir, to the corvette, and I do not wish to have another
broadside
into me, which I should be sure to have if I obeyed your order.'
`Do not fear, my good sir, `answered Freemantle with a smile. `I will, if
you please, take the responsibility upon myself.'
And going aft he seized the ensign halyards on which the American flag
was still bent, and the next instant the striped bunting was gaily fluttering in
the air on its ascent to its former place at the peak. The Captain of the
merchantman
looked at this bold act with astonishment and visible alarm.
Freemantle
made the halyards fast, and then turning to him said cooly
`My good Captain will you give the order to brace round and fill away
again.'
`With the greatest pleasure in the world, my fine fellow,' answered Captain
Niles, catching something of his spirit. `I never lowered a flag with more
reluctance, nor saw it go up again with more fear; but I will save my ship if I
can.'
`You can do it. The corvette lies at the mercy of my schooner's sixty-four
pounder if she dares to fire, and besides she has as much as she can do to look
after herself and get safely off again into blue water.'
`Square away the yards,' shouted the American in a loud, cheery tone.
The men sprung with alacrity to the lifts and braces, and the heavy main
yard, with the three sails above it, swung round to their place all together, and
the pilot of the privateer taking his post at the helm by Freemantle's order, in
a minute or two more, the ship was again in motion standing towards the
entrance
of the inner channel in the direction of her port.
The Captain could not help keeping a wary eye fixed upon his enemy, the
corvette, from whom he was escaping, under the supervision of the daring
young privateersman, each moment looking to see the flash of a dozen cannon
issue from her ports.
`You watch her closely, Captain,' said Freemantle placing himself by his
side. `But if you take your glass you will see that her ports are down.'
`True! I did not see that.'
`They closed them to make sure that I would not let my Long Tom trouble
them while they are getting off. Be assured, worthy Captain Niles, that the
commander of that corvette is far more anxious to escape than you are. He
would give a thousand pounds had he Boston light bearing west by north five
leagues.'
`You are a remarkable young man,' ejaculated the Captain, looking him
full in the face. `Is it possible you are the commander of the schooner that
has acted so noble a part to save my ship.'
`I have but done my duty. You have sailed and manuvred your vessel well,
Captain, or I could not have been of the service I have proved to you.'
`You have saved my ship.'
`I
meant to do so
,' answered the young sailor in a very positive tone.
`And, sir, that you have been successful I have now no further doubts,' said
Mr. Forrest, who was standing by surveying in silence the youthful
appearance
,
and yet bold, determined air of their deliverer. The corvette is
standing
seaward with the best of her ability. You are a brave man and permit me
to grasp you hand. You have done what was never done before, and which
no other man but you would have thought of doing. As owner in part of this
ship and possessor of no little amount of treasure on board, allow me, my
young Captain, to thank you sincerely for your perseverance and the good
result
it has brought to all. By and by you shall have more tangible assurance
of my gratitude.'
`You are very kind,' answered the privateer captain, modestly. I have done
nothing worthy of praise, for the result has shown, I have done only what I
had the power to do.'
`Your vessel is a privateer?' asked or rather remarked Mr. Forrest after a
moment's silence.
`Yes, sir.'
`She has received some damage. I wish her to be repaired at my expense
in port, and it is my wish to give to each of your men fifty dollars, and to each
officer one hundred, in token of my appreciation of their services.'
`I have more than a hundred men, and when they learn this, sir, they will
all be likely to report themselves as officers. You know how democratic
privateers
are, sir,' said Freemantle, laughing.'
`From what your pilot says, sir, and from what I have seen of you and
the manuvering of your vessel,' said Captain Niles, with a shrug of the
shoulder, `I don't think there is much democracy in your craft. I expect that
every man aboard of her knows who's captain.'
`Are your telegraphic signals on deck?' abruptly asked the young sailor
without making any reply.
`Yes, sir.'
`Allow me to make use of them to communicate with my schooner.'
`Sir you are master of this ship and all on board, and glad am I that it is
to you I say it, instead of to John Bull, yonder. He is fairly taking himself
off! Well, if I ever expected to see Boston again without paying England a
visit and trying Dartmoor beef and bread for a twelvemonth. You are a
devilish
brave fellow and I only wish I was King of England five minutes that I
might make an admiral of you.'
Freemantle went aft and arranging his signals sent them to the mast head.
`Quick Mary, child and examine the signal-book and tell me what it is,'
said Colonel I lood to his daughter, who, after being a while below, had been
driven by her anxiety once more to join her father and brother in the cupola,
`What are the colors, sir?' she asked of her father, who had been watching
the progress of things on the water, his glass at his eye, with unflagging
interest
,
at times not a little mystified by the proceedings he had beheld from a
distance, seeing with less advantage than we who have been taken
immediately
on board the several vessels and shared in the events as they were
occurring
.
The colors are red, blue and white, with a red square.'
`It is `stand on after the enemy!' '
`There is another flyingthe former being taken down. The colors are
white, red, blue, blue. How do they read?'
`Follow her off soundings and then tack for port!'
`Is it possible the corvette is fairly driven away from her prey, and by a
little
schooner!' exclaimed Colonel Hood.
`She is really retreating and the schooner is following not half a mile
stren,' said Henry. `The schooner has signals flying. I will make them out,
sister. They read,
`Shall I fire? Look at the answering signal, Mary, as you have the glass.
Mary, was, however, trying to make out, not signals, but the form of her
truant lover for whom she was in the greatest apprehension, though she strove
to conceal it from her father.
`It is blue!'
`The answer is `
no!
' '
`Then there is a truce really made between the belligerents,' said Colonel
Hood. `I was right in my conjecture that the privateersman offered to cease
firing if he would, after his masts went overboard, and make no further
attempts
upon the merchant-man. And see how bravely the merchant-man is
standing towards her port. She is full a mile from where she lay to, and the
wind is fair for her to make her port. Now if I had a boat and rowers, Henry
I would like to pull on board and congratulate her captain and shake hands
with the gallant privateersman, who from the signalizing must have been in
the flag boat which boarded her! I have the strongest impression that my
friend Foster Forrest is on board a passenger.'
`I trust if so, that he may have escaped unharmed,' said Henry.
`And Clara! poor Clara,' added Miss Hood with emotion, and her heart
added, `poor Hebert! rash and cruel Hebert to give me so much pain! I know
that I love you more than you deserve, and I feel that you do not appreciate my
deep attachment to you with that noble consideration for mydevotion to you which
I look for! I know you
are
not worthy, but my heart will not let my judgment
rule!'
The ship was now standing bravely on towards the point which she had
been so zealously striving to reach when chased by the corvette; the latter
was stretching seaward between the islands on the larbord tack the way she
had come, under her head sails braced up, a stay-sail and a sort of driver made
of a topsail hoisted upon a spare topmast stepped and fidded firmly into the
cavity in the deck which once held the mizzen mast. Under this odd show of
canvass the late victorious Englishman was making the best of his way towards
the nighest port of the provinces. The schooner was sailing to windward of
him and a little more than half a mile astern, under shortened sail to keep from
oversailing her,her foresail being furled,her fore-course clued up, her jib-hauled
down,and running under her heavy mainsail,her large and square fore-topsail and
topgallant-sail only. With her black hull crouching low upon the water, her
tall raking masts and her large yards and breadth of canvass, she presented to
the eye a very beautiful nautical object, at once picturesque and menacing.
To the north were seen a very large schooner and a schooner-brig, standing
E. S. E. close hauled, as if with the intention of cutting off the corvette. The
whole scene seaward, therefore, was singularly lively and replete with
interest
;
and with the numerous islands of green verdure girding the bay, the bold
promontary to the left of the villa, and the shores and eminences black with
the masses of country-people, who had gathered on every eminence in sight of
the bay to witness the combat and chase, the view, altogether, afforded to those
who were spectators in the cupola, was both novel and imposing, and one long
to be remembered.
While their eyes were directed with most interest towards the escaped
merchantman, to their surprise they saw her suddenly come to the wind, lay
her main-topsail to the mast and become stationary.
CHAPTER IX.
THE EAST-INDIAN'S DAUGHTER.
To
account for this new manuvre of the merchantman we will once more
return on board of her. After Freemantle had set and got answers to his
telegraphic
signals, the East Indian merchant, Mr. Forrest, came up to him and
taking him by the hand said,
`Now my brave youth, for youth I may call you, though you have achieved
what few with gray heads and three score years experience could have
succeeded
in accomplishing, come with me and let me present you to one who
would also thank you as well as see the gallant seaman to whom she owes her
liberty, and that of her father.'
`Your daughter, sir?' asked the young man with a heightened color.
`Yes.'
`I trust she has received no injury amid all this firing.'
`No. I sent her below, albeit, she would have insisted on remaining on
deck and seeing the matter out. She is a brave girl and did not like to hide
from shot. Come, sir, will you accompany me below?'
`Not just this moment, if you please, Mr. Forrest, answered the youth; `I
am not in a fit condition to appear before a lady; for you see I am grim with
powder and not quite in toilet.'
`That is the way with all you handsome young fellows; you are not content,
with the superabundance of good looks nature heaps upon you, but these you
must improve if you can. Now a brave man don't want pomatum nor curling
irons!'
`He may want water and a napkin, sir,' answered Freemantle laughing at
his manner. `But I would rather remain on deck to see how the ship gets
ahead and watch the corvette.'
`The corvette don't need any watching. She is putting her best foot
foremost
to get away from your sharp eyes, and I dare say regrets she had not kept
away in the first place. What could have led you to undertake to protect us
from so large a vessel. The very idea was madness.'
`I knew that I had any sloop of war at vantage with her usual weight of
metal; that with my sixty-four pounder she could not come within reach of
me, while I could do her immense mischief by cannonading her from a distance.'
`And this you did most skillfully. I never was so much surprised at any
thing in my life as when I saw you bear down, signalize us, and then open
your fire upon the corvette. We already considered ourselves prisoners; but
I must confess your intrepidity and the well directed fire you kept up gave us
new courage. But when we at last came under the guns of the Englishman
all we had to do was to thank the brave privateersman in our hearts for his
good intentions in our behalf and strike our colors. But there it flies again,
and the ship and all on board is more rightfully yours, Captain Freematle, than
it would have been the Englishman's, if we were now lashed along side of
him.'
`
All
on board, sir?' asked the young seaman archly.
`Yesno! Oh, you rogue! You are thinking of my daughter, eh! But
you have not seen her yet or you might covet her! But she is an exception.
All
but
Clara!' added the merchant playfully; for his joy at recovering his
ship and the safety of himself and daughter gave him high spirits.
Freemantle looked slightly grave, or rather sad at this reply. It was,
however
,
but a shadow of feeling, whatever might have produced it, and
immediately
passed away from his fine face, leaving his features with that quiet,
resolute
expression stamped upon them which so singularly characterized them.
`I will go down then and bring up the lady and let her thank you in person,
and if she says
all
why, perhaps I may; but we must know first if you like
her looks well enough to take her even as a prisoner of war,' added the proud
father, who confident in the peerless beauty of his child thus spoke to him of
her whom he was about to present to him.
Freemantle turned and walked rapidly aft as the merchant descended into
the cabin. Upon his face was a singular expression of perplexity and
gratification
.
`The merchant is in high spirits, sir,' said the captain of the ship to Hebert,
who at Freemantle's request had been from the instant he came on board
aiding
the officers of the merchantman in getting necessary repairs completed,
and making more sail so that she could reach her port before night, it being
now within an hour of sunset. He had now completed his services and was
going aft to speak with Freemantle when the captain detained him.
`What is his name, sir?' asked Hebert. `Is he an American?'
`A Boston man born and bred; but went to India twenty years ago; married
there a beautiful English girl, and has a daughter more beautiful than her
mother, who died three years ago. His name is Foster Forrest, of the house
of Forrest & Co., Canton.'
`My uncle's friend,' exclaimed Hebert. `He has been long expecting him
and his daughter and feared he might be in this ship. That is feared when he
saw that you were likely to be captured.'
`There is no fear now, thanks to that confoundedly brave little fellow! If he
has'nt put a silver feather in his cap to day its because there ain't no honor in
being a brave man and a good sailor. I should'nt wonder if '
But Hebert did not want to hear the end of his speech; for hastening to
Freemantle, who stood with his back towards him looking in the direction of
his schooner, but with an excited expression upon his face that showed plainly
his thoughts were not with his eyes, he said,
`Did you know, my brave captain, we have a fair East Indian on board! You
must play the hero and she the heroine. Besides she is a millionaire and
rumor
says is a beauty. It is Miss Clara Forrest, the daughter of the dark
looking
man I saw you talking with while I was showing those sailors how to set
the top-gailant yard that was shot out of the slings.'
Freemantle made no reply. He slightly smiled and then nibbled his under
lip as if annoyed. Hebert looked at him a moment and then with a mortified
look turned away, muttering,
`If he is as brave as a lion he is as cross as a tiger. But let him have his
humor. We shall be friends after we have sailed together awhile. If not we
can be enemies, that's one comfort! I should like to know who he is? Nobody
seems to know among his men. When I boarded him he frankly gave me his
hand, and as if he had known me all his life and at the same moment bluntly
asked me my name! When I told him what it was, and how I had come on
board to offer my aid in annoying the corvette, he received me warmly; but
when I told him afterwards in the cabin that I had been in the navy and
courtmartialed
,
he gave me the cold shoulder all at once, as if a broken midshipman
was'nt a better man than the skipper of a privateering raker, confound him!
But he is a brave fellow, though he carries his head quite too princely for my
taste! Mr. Hebert, he calls me, as if he could not remember the whole of a
man's name! He does'nt answer me unless he chooses, and presumes as much
on his captaincy as a reefer promoted to the command of the launch. Well, I
will try him and if we don't agree as he says it, we can part company. I am
tired of shore-life: and there is no chance of running away with my pretty
cousin yet awhile; for she has put her little foot down on that score very
resolutely. So I will try privateering for the love of adventure. If I humor
my hero, I can get along well enough, and by and by, for I have my eye ahead
of the present, I may be in command myself. He is so daring some lucky
ball may knock his head off ere long, and give me his birth.'
Such were the thoughts that passed through the mind, rather than emanated
from the lips, of Hebert Vincent, as he slowly walked away from the young
seaman who was both an object of his admiration and dislike, and also of his
fear; nevertheless he resolved on accepting the birth he offered him, hoping,
perhaps,
meaning
, that some occasion should befal which would place him in
the command to which his adventurous and loose ambition suddenly aspired.
His attention was now drawn to the East Indian Merchant who came on
deck leading his daughter. On beholding her, Hebert involuntarily raised his
hat and bowed to her, while the admiring gaze of his eyes did homage to her
charms.
Seeing him to be a strangera young manand wearing the navy button
Clara Forrest at once supposed it to be the youthful captain of the privateer
of whom her father had been speaking to her in the warmest terms; and
under
this impression she smiled, and was about to advance towards him with
generous warmth, her hand frankly extended when her father arrested her.
`Nay, Clara! That is one of his officers! There is the captain to whom
the first expressions of your gratitude are due.'
As he spoke he pointed aft to Freemantle, who stood with his face turned
perseveringly away, although he could not have been otherwise, than aware
that the merchant had returned to the deck with his daughter.
Clara Forrest was a brilliant girl of eighteen, matured by the glowing sun of
India into the full bloom of beauty. Her soft chesnut hair, shaded a
complexion
of the purest olive, if a tint, a thought darker than a blonde can be
termed
an olive. Her eyes were a pair of those large, open hazel orbs, fretted
with long curved lashes that are such a beautiful feature in the wild roe; yet
though the expression was as gentle, and deep as that of the roe, there was
no want in them of that sparkling light which is the radiation from a cheerful
spirit. Her form was slight, yet buoyant with health, and of the most be
witching
symmetry. As she stepped across the deck towards the young captain,
after returning Hebert's bow, leaning upon her father's arm, she moved with
that grace of mien and faultless precision of step which marks the high bred
maiden of whatever land, and more especially of `the land of the sun and flowers.'
Before they got to him she eyed him earnestly, and with that startled look
with which one unexpectedly recogaizes an acquaintance, when expecting only
to behold a stranger. She pressed her father's armarrested her stepher
dark eyes expressed surprise, doubt, hope, pleasure, all in one earnest gaze
upon him. Still his back was towards her.
`Clara are you ill?' asked Mr. Forrest, observing her changing cheek, and
feeling her hand tremble as it grasped his arm.
`Nono sir!' she faltered.
At this crisis, the young privateersman turned suddenly round, fixed his eye
full upon hers with a glance of mingled love and warning, but so quick and
rapid was it that it was unobserved by all,save Herbert, who had noticed her
embarrassment, and was closely watching both her and him.
`They have met before;' he said, emphatically, as this peculiar glance from
him to her was detected by him. `Here is a mystery for me to unravel at my
leisure! My captain is likely to prove a hero indeed, and for what I see this
fine Indian girl a heroine. Is it possible that he can have seen her in India?
But let me watch the play.'
`This is my daughter,' captain. She desires to thank you for your gallant
rescue of the ship, and for her own escape from becoming a prisoner to the en
emy.'
The privateersman lifted his cap and bowed low before the beautiful girl
is face was glowing with a rich color, but hers was very pale. He did not
speak, nor
could
she. She made an effort twice to say something, and then
turning to her father, she said faintly,
`I am not well! Please to conduct me to my cabin!'
Alarmed and anxious he hastened to obey. The young sailor hesitated an
instant, then sprung forward and took her hand to aid him. At the entrance
of the cabin he left her to her father, but Hebert did not fail to detect a deep
glancea soulmeeting-soul gaze that passed between them, as he turned
from her away, and a warm pressure of the clasped hands ere they were
unlocked
.
`Yes, they have not only met ere now,' he repeated still more emphatically
than before; `
but they are lovers!
'
CHAPTER X.
THE LANDING.
In
a few minutes Mr. Forrest returned to the deck. As he reached it
Hebert
advanced towards him and bowing said,
`Mr. Forrest, of Canton, I believe?'
`Yes, sir.'
`I trust your daughter is better?'
`She is, sir.'
`You are a friend of Colonel Hood?'
`A most intimate one. Do you know him, sir, and can you tell me how he
fares?' asked the East Indian, with animation.
`He is my uncle, sir. My mother was his sister.'
`Captain Vincent's son?'
`Yes, sir.'
`I am glad to see you, my dear sir,' exclaimed Mr. Forrest, taking his hand
and warmly shaking it. `I knew your father well. He was a brave officer,
and did good service at Tripoli in that war, I am told! I can see his looks in
you. But of my friend, Colonel Hoodyour uncle?'
`He is not only well, but I have seen and spoken with him within two hours.
`Within two hours!'
`Yes, sir. Do you see on the shore of the bay, a villa in the Italian style,
amid gardens, with a lawn sweeping boldly to the water?'
`About two and a half miles to the south-west of us?'
`Yes, sir. That is Colonel Hood's residence. From the cupola he and his
family have been witnesses of the chase and firing; and I left them only when
the ship struck to board the schooner and advise her captain to have the ship
run ashore here, the passengers landed with the most valuable portable articles,
and then the vessel to be set on fire, rather than fall into the hands of the Eng
lish. I was in the little shore boat, sir, which you probably noticed.'
`I did! I am thankful this captain Freemantle did not have to take such a
step. He has brought the affair to a noble result. That, then, is Colonel
Hood's abode!' added the merchant earnestly looking in the direction of the
villa. Captain Niles,' he said turning to this officer; `yonder is the dwelling
of the person I most wish to see, my friend Colonel Hood. If you would land
me here any where upon the beach with my daughter and servant we will walk
to the house. A run ashore after being one hundred and forty days at sea will
be exhilerating. My young friend, Mr. Vincent will accompany us and show
us the way.'
`With pleasure, sir! I can obtain a carriage for you at the first house we
should come to.'
`Then I will land here, captain, instead of going on to Boston; and
especially
as Clara does not seem very well; and absence from the ship will benefit
her; for she will not feel that we are free from capture by the enemy until we
are safe along side of the wharf.
`I will land you here, sir, if you wish it,' answered Captain Niles. `It will
be morning as the tide and wind are, before we get in and drop anchor.'
He then gave the order to back the main top-sail and in a minute or two
more the ship was stationary again. It was this manuvre that attracted the
attention and excited the curiosity of the party in the cupola.
The boat was lowered and brought along side, and the necessary luggage
placed in it. Colonel Hood then approached Freemantle, who had remained
all the while leaning over the quarter bulwarks, with his eyes absently fixed
upon his own vessel, which was steadily following the seaward sailing corvette.
`My noble young friend, I cannot leave this ship without expressing to you
again my warmest gratitude. But for your bravery, skill, and generous
perseverance
in our behalf, I and my daughter would now have been prisoners in
yonder English vessel of war and this fair ship her prize.'
`You are going on shore, sir?' quietly asked or rather remarked the young
privateer Captain, turning and looking him full in the face.
`Yes, and I should be happy to have you accompany me. You can let your
vessel meet you in Boston, and you can ride over to the city in three hours
tomorrow
,
if you wish it. Come sir, as Colonel Hood's friend, I will invite you
to be his guest with me. He has a claim upon you, for he owes me and my
daughter to your gallantry.'
The face of the young man flushed with some pleasurable emotion.
He answered with quickness,
`I will accept the invitation, sir!
`Then our party will be complete.'
`Mr. Vincent, said Freemantle, approaching him, `a word with you.'
Hebert turned aside with him, wondering at this request and its object.
`You have desired to enter on board the schooner for a cruise. I have
promised
you the berth now held by my first officer, who leaves the vessel as
soon as she reaches port. You are willing to accept this berth on the terms
we subsequently agreed upon?'
`Yes; for I have an ambition to sail with you.'
`You said you would join the schooner to-morrow.'
`Yes!'
`It is my desire that you should continue on in the merchantman to the city
and there remain until the privateer comes in, go on board of her and take
charge until I make my appearance,'
`And
you
?' asked Hebert with surprise, yet suspecting the truth.
`I am going to land with Mr. Forrest at his invitation. To-morrow
perhaps
to-night I shall take horse and gallop over to the city. Are you disposed
to comply with my wishes.
Hebert was for a moment thoughtful. Some plan seemed passing through
and developing itself in his subtle mind.
`When do you expect the schooner into port?' he asked in an indifferent
tone.
`She will tack after she sees the corvette three or four leagues at sea.'
`You wish me to take command until your appearance, after she gets in?'
`Yes.'
`But the first officer may not leave as you anticipateor may refuse to resign
her without an order from you.'
`This I will give!' he answered.
And taking from his finger a small ring of plan gold he placed it on that of
Vincent. `Give this to him and he will execute my will,' he said in a decided
tone. And without waiting further word, he turned away to follow Mr.
Forrest
and his daughter who were standing in the boat.
`Where is my friend's nephew, Mr. Vincent?' asked Mr. Forrest.
`He remains on board to go up to the city,' briefly answered the young
privateersman
.
`Then you have changed your mind?'
`Yes,' answered Hebert, in a hesitating, perplexed tone; for he had been so
taken by surprise and so influenced by the resolute purpose manifested by
Freemantle, that he had had no time for reflection. He would gladly have
gone in the boat for he wanted to solve the mystery of the former
acquaintance
of Freemantle with Clara Forrest; and then he did not like to be ordered
so peremptorily. But he had in his mind other thoughts, bold and ambitious,
that induced him to suffer things to be, as Freemantle had directed, for the
present, murmuring to himself as the boat put away
`My time will come too, my gay cavalier.'
`You need not lay to for the return of the boat, I will send it round to the
harbor tomorrow,' called out the privateersman, who instead of sitting in the
stern sheets with Mr. Forrest and Clara, was standing up on the forward thwart
of the boat, which position he held until it struck the beach within half a mile
of the villa. When they stepped on shore and looked back, they saw the ship
just disappearing round the headland to the northward, the corvette hull
down-to
the east, and the schooner still steadily following her with the dogged per
severance of a sleuth hound placed upon the track of a wounded stag.
THE END.`Hebert Vincent, late midshipman in the Navy of the United States, having
deserted his ship at Newport, is dismissed from the service; his expulsion to
take effect from the 14th inst.
Navy Department
,
`Washington,
Sept. 28, 1814.'